Alabama, session 2026rs, HB536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Beginning June 1, 2026, the Sheriff of
Henry County shall receive an additional expense allowance in
an amount that brings his or her total compensation to
ninety-four thousand dollars ($94,000) per year.
(b) Beginning January 18, 2027, the base annual salary
for the sheriff shall be ninety-four thousand dollars
($94,000) per year, in lieu of all other expense allowances or
other forms of compensation.
(c)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (b), beginning
January 18, 2027, any individual serving as sheriff shall
receive an increase in his or her then-existing salary of
eight percent for each second or subsequent successive term to
which he or she is elected sheriff.
(2) An individual who returns to the office of sheriff
for any non-successive term shall be compensated as if he or
she has obtained the office of sheriff for the first time, and
shall be eligible for increases pursuant to subdivision (1)
only for currently successive service.
(d) The sheriff shall receive all benefits provided to
employees of the Henry County Commission, but he or she shall
not be eligible for any increases in compensation pursuant to
Page 1

not be eligible for any increases in compensation pursuant to
HB536 Enrolled
Chapter 2A of Subtitle 1 of Title 11, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. Section 45-34-230, Code of Alabama 1975,
relating to the compensation of the Sheriff of Henry County,
is repealed.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
HB536 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 10-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 19-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3